Wyoming, session 2025, SF0014.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-2-205 is created to read:

21-2-205. Wyoming imagination library program.

(a) As used in this section:

SF0014

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0229
(i) "County based affiliate program" means a
local affiliate of the Wyoming imagination library program
that operates within a county;

(ii) "Participating county" means a county with
not less than one (1) county based affiliate program;

(iii) "Registered eligible child" means a child
from birth to five (5) years of age who resides in this
state and who is registered in a county based affiliate
program.

(b) The Wyoming imagination library program is
created to be administered by the department of education.
The purpose of the program shall be to promote the
development of a comprehensive statewide initiative for
encouraging children from birth to five (5) years of age to
develop a love of reading and learning.

(c) The department of education shall coordinate with
a nonprofit entity, qualified under section 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code and organized solely to promote
and encourage reading by children, to:
SF0014

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0229

(i) Provide at least one (1) age appropriate
book to each registered eligible child in each
participating county monthly at no cost to families;

(ii) Promote the statewide development of county
based affiliate programs and advance and strengthen the
county based affiliate programs to increase enrollment;

(iii) Develop a public awareness campaign to
promote the program and ensure the public is aware of the
opportunity to register eligible children to receive free
books through the program;

(iv) Administer the county based affiliate
program funding match requirement as specified in
subsection (d) of this section and coordinate the
collection and remittance of books;

(v) Solicit donations, gifts and other funding
to financially support county based affiliate programs.

SF0014

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0229
(d) Each participating county based affiliate program
shall contribute fifty percent (50%) of the funds required
for the program to operate in the county directly to the
department of education. The department of education shall
manage the funds received by each participating county
based affiliate program. To the extent that funds are
available in the Wyoming imagination library program
account created in subsection (e) of this section, the
department of education shall provide to each participating
county based affiliate program an additional amount from
the Wyoming imagination library program account not to
exceed the amount of funds received from each participating
county based affiliate program.

(e) There is created the Wyoming imagination library
program account. The account shall include all legislative
appropriations and all monies received from grants, gifts,
transfers, bequests and donations to the account. The
account is authorized to accept grants, gifts, transfers,
bequests and donations. All monies received shall be
deposited into the account. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008,
9-2-1012(e) or 9-4-207, unobligated and unexpended funds in
the account shall not lapse or revert and shall remain in
SF0014

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0229
the account and be available for distribution as provided
in this section.

(f) Monies deposited into the Wyoming imagination
library program account shall be continuously appropriated
to and expended by the department of education to
administer the Wyoming imagination library program
established under subsection (b) of this section and to
provide the state's share of any matching funds as required
under subsection (d) of this section.

(g) Funds in the Wyoming imagination library program
account shall be invested by the state treasurer pursuant
to law and the investment earnings shall be credited to the
account.

(h) The department of education shall promulgate
rules necessary to carry out this section.

Section 2. There is appropriated three hundred twenty
thousand dollars ($320,000.00) from the general fund to the
Wyoming imagination library program account created in
section 1 of this act. This appropriation shall be for the
SF0014

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0229
period beginning with the effective date of this act. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e)
and 9-4-207 this appropriation shall not revert. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation shall be
included in the department of education's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0014